There are certain truths which are so obvious that the general run of 
people disregard them. People are so blind to some of the simplest facts in 
everyday life that they are highly surprised when somebody calls attention to 
what everybody ought to know. 


Examples of the Columbus egg are around us in hundreds of thousands, 
but Columbuses are rare. 


Walking about in the garden of Nature, most men have the self-conceit to 
think that they know everything, yet almost all are blind to one of the 
outstanding principles that Nature employs in her work. 


This principle may be called the inner isolation which characterises 
each and every living species on this earth. 


Even a superficial glance is sufficient to show that all the innumerable 
forms in which the life-urge of Nature manifests itself are subject to a 
fundamental law—one may call it an iron law of Nature—which compels the 
various species to keep within the definite limits of their own life-forms when 
propagating and multiplying their kind. 


Each animal mates only with one of its own species. The titmouse 
cohabits only with the titmouse, the finch with the finch, the stork with the 
stork, the field-mouse with the field-mouse, the house-mouse with the house- 
mouse, the wolf with the she-wolf, etc. 


Deviations from this law take place only in exceptional circumstances. 
This happens especially under the compulsion of captivity, or when some other 
obstacle makes procreative intercourse impossible between individuals of the 
same species. 


Nature abhors such irregular intercourse with all her might and her 
protest is most clearly demonstrated by the fact that the hybrid is either sterile, 
or the fecundity of its descendants is limited. 


In most cases hybrids and their progeny are denied the ordinary powers 
of resistance to disease or the natural means of defence against attack. 


Such a dispensation of Nature is quite logical. Every crossing of two 


316 


breeds which are not, of equal standing results in a product which holds an 
intermediate place between the levels of the two parents. 


This means that the offspring will indeed be superior to that parent 
which belongs to a biologically lower order of beings, but not so high as the 
superior parent. 


For this reason, it must eventually succumb in any struggle against the 
higher species. Such mating contradicts the will of Nature towards the 
selective improvement of life in general. 


The favourable preliminary to this improvement is not to mate 
individuals of higher and lower orders of being, but rather to allow the 
complete triumph of the higher order. 


The stronger must dominate and not mate with the weaker, which would 
signify the sacrifice of its own higher nature. 


Only the born weakling can look upon this principle as cruel, and if he 
does so, it is merely because he is of a feebler nature and narrower mind, for if 
such a law did not direct the process of evolution then the higher development 
of organic life would not be conceivable at all. 


This urge for the maintenance of the unmixed breed which is a 
phenomenon that prevails throughout the whole of the natural world, results not 
only in the sharply defined outward distinction between one species and 
another, but also in the internal similarity of characteristic qualities which are 
peculiar to each breed or species. 


The fox remains always a fox, the goose remains a goose, and the tiger 
will retain the character of a tiger. The only difference that can exist within the 
species is in the various degrees of structural strength and active power, in the 
intelligence, efficiency, endurance, etc., with which the individual specimens 
are endowed. 


It would be impossible to find a fox which has a kindly and protective 
disposition towards geese, just as no cat exists which has a friendly 
disposition towards mice. 


That is why the struggle between the various species does not arise from 
a feeling of mutual antipathy, but rather from hunger and love. 


S17 


In both cases Nature looks on calmly and is even pleased with what 
happens. The struggle for daily livelihood leaves behind in the ruck everything 
that is weak, diseased or wavering; while the fight of the male to possess the 
female gives to the strongest the right, or at least the possibility, to propagate 
its kind. 


This struggle is a means of furthering the health and powers of resistance 
of the species, thus it is one of the causes underlying the process of 
development towards a higher grade of being. If this were otherwise the 
progressive process would cease, and even retrogression might set in. 


Since the inferior always outnumber the superior, the former would 
always increase more rapidly if they possessed the same capacity for survival 
and for the procreation of their kind, and the final consequence would be that 
the best in quality would be forced to recede into the background. 


Therefore, a corrective measure must intervene in favour of the better 
quality. Nature supplies this by establishing rigorous conditions of life, to 
which the weaker will have to submit and will thereby be numerically 
restricted, but even that portion which survives cannot multiply 
indiscriminately, for here a new and rigorous selection takes place, according 
to strength and health. 


If Nature does not wish that weaker individuals should mate with 
stronger, she wishes even less that a superior race should intermingle with an 
inferior one, because in such a case all her efforts, throughout hundreds of 
thousands of years, to establish an evolutionary higher stage of being, may be 
rendered futile. 


History furnishes us with innumerable instances that prove this law. 


It shows, with startling clarity, that whenever Aryans have mingled their 
blood with that of an inferior race, the result has been the downfall of the 
people who were the champions of a higher culture. 


In North America, where the population is prevalently Teutonic, and 
where those elements intermingled with the inferior race only to a very small 
degree, we have a quality of mankind and a civilisation which are different 
from those of Central and South America. 


In these latter countries the immigrants—who belonged mainly to the 
Latin races—mated with the aborigines, sometimes to a very large extent 


318 


indeed. 


In this case, we have a clear and decisive example of the effect produced 
by the mixture of races. 


In North America the Teutonic element, which has kept its racial stock 
pure and did not mix it with any other racial stock, has come to dominate the 
American Continent and will remain master of it as long as that element does 
not fall a victim to the habit of adulterating its blood. 


In short, the results of miscegenation are always the following: 
(a) The level of the superior race becomes lowered. 


(b) Physical and mental degeneration sets in, thus leading slowly but 
steadily towards a progressive drying up of the vital, sap. 


The act which brings about such a development is a sin against the will 
of the Eternal Creator, and as a sin this act will be avenged. 


Man’s effort to build up something that contradicts the iron logic of 
Nature brings him into conflict with those principles to which he himself 
exclusively, owes his own existence. 


By acting against the laws of Nature he prepares the way that leads to his 
ruin. 


Here we meet with the insolent objection, which is Jewish in its 
inspiration and is typical of the modem pacifist, that “Man can overcome 
Nature.” 


There are millions who repeat by rote that piece of Jewish babble and 
end up by imagining that somehow they themselves are the conquerors of 
Nature. 


Yet their only weapon is a mere idea, and a very preposterous idea into 
the bargain, because if one accepted it, then it would be impossible to forma 
conception of the world. 


The real truth is, that not only has man failed to overcome Nature in any 
sphere whatsoever, but that at best he has merely succeeded in getting hold of 
and lifting a tiny corner of the enormous veil which she has spread over her 
eternal mysteries and secrets. 


319 


He never invents anything; all he can do is to discover something. He 
does not master Nature, but has only come to be master of those living beings 
who have not gained the knowledge he has arrived at by penetrating into some 
of Nature’s laws and mysteries. 


Apart from all this, an idea can never subject to its own sway those 
condition; which are necessary for the existence and development of mankind, 
for the idea itself has come only from man. 


Without man there would be no human idea in this world. The idea as 
such is, therefore, always dependent on the existence of man and is 
consequently dependent on those laws which furnish the conditions of his 
existence. 


Not only that. Certain ideas are even confined to certain people. This 
holds true with regard to those ideas, in particular, which have not their roots 
in objective scientific truth, but in the world of feeling. 


In other words, to use a phrase which is current to-day and which well 
and clearly expresses this truth: They reflect an inner experience. 


All such ideas, which have nothing to do with cold logic as such, but 
represent mere manifestations of feeling, such as ethical and moral 
conceptions, etc., are inextricably bound up with man’s existence. 


It is to the creative powers of man’s imagination that such ideas owe 
their existence. 


For this very reason, a necessary condition for the preservation of such 
ideas is the existence of certain races and certain types of men. 


For example, anyone who sincerely wishes the pacifist idea to prevail in 
this world ought to do all he 1s capable of doing to help the Germans conquer 
the world, for in case the reverse should happen, it may easily be that the last 
pacifist would disappear with the last German. 


I say this because, unfortunately, scarcely any other people in the world 
has ever fallen a prey to this nonsensical and illogical idea to the same degree 
as our own. Whether of the effect that outer circumstances have upon it. 


Then, if you are serious, whether you like it or not, you must make up 
your mind to wage wars in order to pave the way for pacifism. This was in fact 


320 


the plan of Woodrow Wilson, the American world-redeemer (at least so our 
visionaries believed) and that was all that was required. 


The pacifist-humanitarian idea may indeed become an excellent one 
when the most superior type of manhood will have succeeded in subjugating 
the world to such an extent that this type 1s then sole master of the earth. This 
idea could have an injurious effect only in the measure in which its application 
became difficult and finally impossible. 


So, first of all, the fight, and then pacifism. If it were otherwise, it would 
mean that mankind has already passed the zenith of its development, and 
accordingly, the end would not be the supremacy of some moral ideal, but 
degeneration into barbarism and consequent chaos. 


People may laugh at this statement, but our planet moved through space 
for millions of years, uninhabited by men, and at some future date may easily 
begin to do so again, if men should forget that wherever they have reached a 
superior level of existence, it was not as a result of following the ideas of 
crazy visionaries but by acknowledging and rigorously observing the iron laws 
of Nature. 


What reduces one race to starvation stimulates another to harder work. 


All the great civilisations of the past became decadent because the 
originally creative race died out, as a result of contamination of the blood. 


The most profound cause of such a decline is to be found in the fact that 
the people ignored the principle that all culture depends on men, and not the 
reverse. 


In other words, in order to preserve a certain culture, the type of 
manhood that creates such a culture must be preserved, but such a preservation 
goes hand in hand with the inexorable law that it is the strongest and the best 
who must triumph and that they have the right to endure. 


He who would live must fight. He who does not wish to fight in this 
world, where permanent struggle is the law of life, has not the right to exist. 


Such a saying may sound hard, but, after all, that is how the matter really 
stands. Yet far harder is the lot of him who believes that he can overcome 
Nature, and thus in reality insults her. Distress, misery, and disease, are her 
rejoinders. 


321 


Whoever ignores or despises the laws of race really deprives himself of 
the happiness to which he believes he can attain, for he places an obstacle in 
the victorious path of the superior race and, by so doing, he interferes with a 
prerequisite condition of, all human progress. 


Loaded with the burden of human sentiment, he falls back to the level of 
a helpless animal. 


It would be futile to attempt to discuss the question as to what race or 
races were the original champions of human culture and were thereby the real 
founders of all that we understand by the word ‘humanity.’ 


It is much simpler to deal with this question in so far as it relates to the 
present time. Here the answer is simple and clear. 


Every manifestation of human culture, every product of art, science and 
technical skill, which we see before our eyes to-day, is almost, exclusively the 
product of the Aryan creative power. All that we admire in the world to-day, 
its science and its art, its technical developments and discoveries, are the 
products of the creative activities of a few peoples, and it may be true that 
their first beginnings must be attributed to one race. 


The existence of civilisation is wholly dependent on such peoples. 
Should they perish, all that makes this earth beautiful will descend with them 
into the grave. 


However great, for example, be the influence which the soil exerts on 
men, this influence will always vary according to the race on which it 
produces its effect. Dearth of soil may stimulate one race to the most strenuous 
efforts and highest achievements; while, for another race, the poverty of the 
soil may be the cause of misery, and finally of undernourishment, with all its 
consequence. 


This very fact fully justifies the conclusion that it was the Aryan alone 
who founded a superior type of humanity; therefore he represents the archetype 
of what, we understand by the term: MAN. 


He is the Prometheus of mankind, from whose shining brow the divine 
spark of genius has at all times flashed forth, always kindling anew that fire 
which, in the form of knowledge, illuminated the dark night by drawing aside 
the veil of mystery and thus showing man how to rise and become master over 
all the other beings on the earth. 


322 


Should he be forced to disappear, a profound darkness will descend on 
the earth; within a few thousand years human culture will vanish and the world 
will become a desert. 


If we divide mankind into three categories—founders of culture, 
champions of culture, and destroyers of culture—the Aryan alone can be 
considered as representing the first category. 


It was he who laid the groundwork and erected the walls of every great 
structure in human culture. Only the shape and colour of such structures are to 
be attributed to the individual characteristics of the various nations. 


It is the Aryan who has furnished the great building-stones and plans for 
the edifices of all human progress; only the way in which these plans have 
been executed 1s to be attributed to the traits of each individual race. 


Within a few decades the whole of Eastern Asia, for instance, 
appropriated a culture and called this culture its own, whereas the basis of that 
culture was the Greek mind and Teutonic technical skill as we know it. 


Only the external form—at least to a certain degree—shows the traits of 
an Asiatic inspiration. 


It is not true, as some believe, that Japan adds European technology to a 
culture of her own. The truth rather is that European science and technology are 
just decked out with the peculiar characteristics of Japanese civilisation. The 
foundations of actual life in Japan to-day are not those of the native Japanese 
culture, although this characterises the external features of the country, which 
features strike the eye of European observers on account of their fundamental 
difference from our own; but the real foundations of contemporary Japanese 
life are the enormous scientific and technical achievements of Europe and 
America, that is to say, of Aryan peoples. 


Only by adopting these achievements as the foundations of their own 
progress can the various nations of the Orient take a place in contemporary 
world progress. 


The scientific and technical achievements of Europe and America 
provide the basis on which the struggle for daily livelihood is carried on in the 
Orient. 


They provide the necessary arms and instruments for this struggle, and 


323 


only the outer forms of these instruments have become gradually adapted to 
Japanese ways of life. 


If, from to-day onwards, the Aryan influence on Japan were to cease, and 
if we suppose that Europe and America were to collapse, then the present 
progress of Japan in science and technique might still last for a short duration; 
but within a few decades the inspiration would dry up, and native Japanese 
character would triumph, while the present civilisation would become 
fossilised and fall back into the sleep from which it was aroused about seventy 
years ago, by the impact of Aryan culture. 


We may, therefore, draw the conclusion that, just as the present Japanese 
development has been due to Aryan influence, so in the immemorial past an 
outside influence and an outside culture brought into existence the Japanese 
culture of that day. 


This opinion is very strongly supported by the fact that the ancient 
civilisation of Japan actually became fossilised and petrified. 


Such a process can take place only if a people loses the racial cell 
which had originally been creative, or if the outside influence should be 
withdrawn after having awakened and maintained the first cultural 
developments in that region. 


If it be shown that a people owes the fundamental elements of its culture 
to foreign races, assimilating and elaborating such elements, and if 
subsequently that culture becomes fossilised whenever the external influence 
ceases, then such a race may be called the champion, but never the creator, of a 
culture. 


If we subject the different peoples to a strict test from this standpoint, we 
shall find that scarcely any one of them has originally created a culture, but 
almost all have been merely the recipients of a culture created elsewhere. 


This development may be depicted as always happening somewhat in the 
following way. Aryan tribes, often almost ridiculously small in number, 
subjugated foreign peoples and, stimulated by the conditions of life which their 
new country offered them (fertility, the nature of the climate, etc.), and profiting 
also by the abundance of manual labour furnished them by the inferior race, 
they developed intellectual and organising faculties which had hitherto been 
dormant in themselves. 


324 


Within the course of a few thousand years, or even centuries, they gave 
life to cultures whose characteristics completely corresponded to the character 
of the founders, though modified by adaptation to the peculiarities of the soil 
and the characteristics of the subjugated people. 


But finally the conquering race offended against the principles which 
they had first observed, namely, the preservation of their racial stock unmixed, 
and began to intermingle with the subjugated people. 


Thus they put an end to their own separate existence, for the original sin 
committed in Paradise has always been followed by the expulsion of the guilty 
parties. 


After a thousand years or more the last visible traces of those former 
masters may then be found in a lighter tint of the skin which the Aryan blood 
had bequeathed to the subjugated race, and in a fossilised culture of which 
those Aryans had been the original creators; for, just as the blood of the 
conqueror, who was a conqueror not only in body but also in spirit, became 
submerged in the blood of the subject race, so the substance disappeared from 
which the torch of human culture and progress was kindled. 


In so far as the blood of the former ruling race has left a light nuance of 
colour in the blood of its descendants, as a token and a memory, the night of 
cultural life is rendered less dim and dark by a mild light radiated from the 
products of those who were the bearers of the original fire. 


Their radiance shines across the barbarism to which the subjected race 
has reverted and might often lead the superficial observer to believe that he 
sees before him an image of the present race, when he is really looking into a 
mirror, wherein only the past is reflected. 


It may happen that in the course of their history such a people will come 
into contact a second time, and even oftener, with the original founders of their 
culture and may not even remember that distant association. 


Instinctively, the remnants of blood, left from that old ruling race will be 
drawn towards this new phenomenon, and what had formerly been possible 
only under compulsion, can now be successfully achieved in a voluntary way. 


A new cultural wave flows in and lasts until the blood of those who 
brought it becomes once again adulterated by intermixture with the originally 
conquered race. 


325 


It will be the task of those who set themselves to write a universal 
history of civilisation, to investigate history from this point of view instead of 
allowing themselves to be smothered under the mass of external data, as is 
only too often the case with our present historical science. 


This short sketch of the changes that take place among those races that 
are only the depositories of a culture, also furnishes a picture of the 
development, the activity and the disappearance of those who are the true 
founders of culture on this earth, namely the Aryans themselves. 


Just as in our daily life the so-called man of genius needs a particular 
occasion, and sometimes needs a special stimulus to bring his genius to light, 
so too, in the life of the peoples the race that has genius in it needs the occasion 
and stimulus to give that genius expression. 


In the monotony and routine of everyday life even persons of significance 
seem just like the others and do not rise beyond the average level of their 
fellow-men, but as soon as such men find themselves in a special situation 
which disconcerts and unbalances the others, the humble person of apparently 
common qualities reveals traits of genius often to the amazement of those who 
have hitherto known him in the petty round of everyday life. 


That is the reason why a prophet is seldom honoured in his own country. 


War offers an excellent occasion for observing this phenomenon. In times 
of distress, when the others despair, apparently harmless, boys suddenly spring 
up and become heroes, full of determination, undaunted in the presence of 
Death and manifesting wonderful powers of calm reflection in such 
circumstances. 


If such an hour of trial did not come, nobody would have thought that the 
soul of a hero lurked in the body of that beardless youth. A special impulse is, 
almost always necessary to bring a man of genius into the foreground. 


The sledge-hammer of Fate, which strikes down the one so easily, 
suddenly finds the counter-impact of steel when it strikes at the other, and, after 
the common shell of everyday life is broken, the core that lay hidden is 
displayed to the eyes of an astonished world. 


This surrounding world then grows perverse and will not believe that 
what had seemed so like itself is really of that different quality so suddenly 
displayed. 


326 


This is a process which is repeated probably every time a man of 
outstanding significance appears. 


Though an inventor, for example, does not establish his fame until the 
very day on which he completes his invention, it would be a mistake to believe 
that the creative genius did not become alive in him until that moment. 


From the very hour of his birth the spark of genius is alive within the 
man who has been endowed with the real creative faculty. 


True genius is an innate quality. It can never be the result of education or 
training. As I have stated already, this holds good not merely of the individual, 
but also of the race. 


Those peoples who manifest creative ability in certain periods of their 
history have always been fundamentally creative. It belongs to their very 
nature, even though this fact may escape the eyes of the superficial observer. 
Here also, recognition from outside is only the consequence of practical 
achievement. 


Since the rest of the world is incapable of recognising genius as such, it 
can only see the visible manifestations of genius in the form of inventions, 
discoveries, buildings, painting, etc., but even here a long time passes before 
recognition is given. 


Just as the individual person who has been endowed with the gift of 
genius, or at least talent of a very high order, cannot develop that gift to the 
full, until he comes under the urge of special circumstances, so in the life of the 
nations their creative capacities and powers frequently have to wait until 
certain conditions stimulate them to action. 


The most obvious example of this truth is furnished by that race which 
has been, and still is, the champion of human progress; I mMean the Aryan 
race. 


As soon as Fate brings them face to face with special circumstances their 
powers begin to develop progressively and to be manifested in tangible form. 


The characteristic cultures which they create in such circumstances are 
almost always conditioned by the soil, the climate and the people they 
subjugate. 


327 


The last factor—that of the character of the people—is the most decisive 
one. The more primitive the technical condition under which the civilizing 
process takes place, the more necessary the existence of manual labour which 
can be organised and employed so as to take the place of mechanical power. 


Had it not been possible for them to employ members of the inferior race 
which they conquered, the Aryans would never have been in a position to take 
the first steps on the road which led them to their culture of a later era; just as, 
without the help of certain suitable animals, which they were able to tame, they 
would never have come to the invention of mechanical power, which has 
subsequently enabled them to do without these animals. 


The remark that the Moor, having lone his duty, could now go, can, 
unfortunately, be applied more or less universally. 


For thousands of years the horse has been the faithful servant of man and 
has helped him to lay the foundations of human progress; but now, motor power 
has rendered the horse superfluous. 


In a few years’ time the use of the horse will cease entirely; and yet 
without its collaboration man could scarcely have reached the stage of 
development at which he now is. 


For the establishment of superior types of civilisation the members of 
inferior races formed one of the most essential prerequisites. They alone could 
supply the lack of mechanical means, without which no progress is possible. 


It is certain that the first stages of human civilisation were not based so 
much on the use of tame animals as on the employment of human beings who 
were members of an inferior race. 


Only after subjugated races were employed as slaves was a similar fate 
allotted to animals, and not vice versa, as some people would have us believe. 


At first it was the conquered enemy who had to draw the plough and only 
afterwards did the ox and horse take his place. Nobody but puling pacifists can 
consider this fact a sign of human degradation. 


Such people fail to recognise that this evolution had to take place in 
order that man might reach that degree of civilisation which these apostles now 
exploit in an attempt to make the world pay attention to their rigmarole. 


328 


The progress of mankind may be compared to the process of ascending 
an infinite ladder. One does not reach the higher level without first having 
climbed the lower rungs. 


The Aryan, therefore, had to take that road which his sense of reality 
pointed out to him, and not that of which the modern pacifist dreams. 


The path of reality is, however, difficult and hard to tread; yet it is the 
only one which finally leads to the goal where the others envisage mankind in 
their dreams. 


The real truth is that those dreamers help to lead man away from his goal 
rather than towards it. 


It was not by mere chance that the first forms of civilisation arose where 
the Aryan came into contact with inferior races, subjugated them and forced 
them to obey his command. 


The members of the inferior race became the first mechanical tools in the 
service of a growing civilisation. Thereby the way was clearly indicated 
which the Aryan had to follow. 


As a conqueror, he subjugated inferior races and turned their physical 
powers into organised channels under his own leadership, forcing them to 
follow his will and purpose. 


By imposing on them a useful, though hard, manner of employing their 
powers, he not only spared the lives of those whom he had conquered, but 
probably made their lives easier than they had been in the former state of so- 
called ‘freedom.’ 


While he ruthlessly maintained his, position as their master, he not only 
remained master, but he also preserved and advanced civilisation, for this 
depended exclusively on his inborn abilities and, therefore, on the preservation 
of the Aryan race as such. 


As soon, however, as his subjects began to rise and approach the level 
of their conqueror, a phase of which ascension was probably the use of his 
language, the barriers that had distinguished master from servant broke down. 


The Aryan neglected to maintain his own racial stock unmixed and 
thereby lost the right to live in the paradise which he himself had created. He 


329 


became submerged in the racial mixture and gradually lost his cultural 
creativeness, until he finally grew, not only mentally but also physically, more 
like the aborigines whom he had subjected, rather than his own ancestors. 


For some time he could continue to live on the capital of that culture 
which still remained; but a condition of fossilisation soon set in and he sank 
into oblivion. 


That is how cultures and empires decline and yield their places to new 
structures. 


The adulteration of the blood and racial deterioration conditioned 
thereby are the only causes that account for the decline of ancient civilisations, 
for it is never by war that nations are ruined, but by the loss of their powers of 
resistance, which are exclusively a characteristic of pure racial blood. 


In this world everything that is not of sound racial stock is like chaff. 
Every historical event in the world is nothing more nor less than a 
manifestation of the instinct of racial self-preservation, whether for weal or 
woe. 


The question as to the basic reasons for the predominant importance of 
Aryanism can be answered by pointing out that it is not so much that the Aryans 
are endowed with a stronger instinct for self-preservation, but rather that this 
manifests itself in a way which is peculiar to themselves. 


Considered from the subjective standpoint, the will to live is, of course, 
equally strong all round and only the forms in which it is expressed are 
different. 


Among the most primitive organisms the instinct for self-preservation 
does not extend beyond the care of the individual ego. 


Egotism, as we call this passion, is so predominant that it includes even 
the time element, which means that the present moment is deemed the most 
important and that nothing is left to the future. 


The animal lives only for itself, searching for food only when it feels 
hunger, and fighting only for the preservation of its own life. 


As long as the instinct for self-preservation manifests itself exclusively 
in such a way, there is no basis for the establishment of a community, not even 


330 


the most primitive form of all, that is to say, the family. 


The community formed by the male with the female, where it goes 
beyond the mere conditions of mating, calls for the extension of the instinct of 
self-preservation, since the readiness to fight for one’s own ego has to be 
extended also to the mate. 


The male sometimes provides food for the female, but in most cases both 
parents provide food for the offspring. Almost always they are ready to protect 
and defend each other, so that here we find the first, though infinitely simple, 
manifestation of the spirit of sacrifice. 


As soon as this spirit extends beyond the narrow limits of the family, we 
have the conditions under which a larger community and finally even States 
can be formed. 


The lowest species of human beings give evidence of this quality only to 
a very small degree, so that often they do not go beyond the foundation of the 
family. 


With an increasing readiness to place their immediate personal interests 
in the background, the capacity for organising more extensive communities 
develops. 


The readiness to sacrifice one’s personal work and, if necessary, even 
one’s life, for others shows its most highly developed form in the Aryan race. 


The greatness of the Aryan is not based on his intellectual powers, but 
rather on his willingness to devote all his faculties to the service of the 
community. 


Here the instinct for self-preservation has reached its noblest form, for 
the Aryan willingly subordinates his own ego to the common weal and, when 
necessity calls, he will even sacrifice his own life for the community. 


The constructive powers of the Aryan and that peculiar ability he has for 
the building up of a culture are not grounded in his intellectual gifts alone. 


If that were so, he might only be destructive and could never have the 
ability to organise; for the essence of organising activity consists in the 
readiness of the individual to renounce his own personal opinions and interests 
and to lay both at the service of the human group. 


331 


By serving the common weal he receives his reward in return; he does 
not, for example, work directly for himself but makes his productive work a 
part of the activity of the group to which he belongs, not only for his own 
benefit but for the general welfare. 


The spirit underlying this attitude is expressed by the word, WORK 
which to him does not at all signify a means of earning one’s daily livelihood 
but rather a productive activity which cannot clash with the interests of the 
community. 


Whenever human activity, is directed exclusively to the service of the 
instinct for self-preservation, regardless of the general weal, it is called theft, 
usury, robbery, burglary, and so on. 


This mental attitude, which forces self-interest to recede into the 
background in favour of the common weal, is the first prerequisite for any kind 
of really human civilisation. 


It is out of this spirit alone that great human achievements have sprung, 
for which the original doers have scarcely ever received any recompense, but 
which turn out to be the source of abundant benefit for their descendants. It is 
this spirit alone which can explain why it so often happens that people can 
endure a harsh but honest existence which offers them no return for their toil 
except a poor and modest livelihood, but such a livelihood helps to 
consolidate the foundations on which the community exists. 


Every worker, every peasant, every inventor, every government official, 
etc., who works without ever achieving fortune or prosperity for himself, is a 
representative of this sublime ideal, even though he may never become 
conscious of the profound meaning of his own activity. 


Everything that may be said of that kind of work which is the 
fundamental condition for providing food and the basic means of human 
progress is true even in a higher sense of work that is done for the protection of 
man and his civilisation. 


The renunciation of one’s own life for the sake of the community is the 
crowning significance of the idea of all sacrifice. In this way only 1s it 
possible to protect what has been built up by man and to ensure that this will 
not be destroyed by the hand of man or of Nature. 


In the German language we have a word which admirably expresses the 


332 


significance underlying all work. It is Pflichterfullung (fulfilment of duty), 
which means the service of the common weal before the consideration of one’s 
own interests. 


The fundamental spirit out of which this kind of activity springs is the 
reverse of ‘egotism,’ and we call it ‘idealism.’ By this we mean to signify the 
willingness of the individual to, make sacrifices for the community and his 
fellow-men. 


It is of the utmost importance to insist again and again, that idealism is 
not merely a superfluous manifestation of sentiment, but rather something 
which has been, is and always will be, a necessary precondition of human 
civilisation; it is to this that the very conception ‘human’ owes its origin. 


To this kind of mentality the Aryan owes his position in the world, and, 
the world is indebted to the Aryan mind for having developed the concept of 
‘mankind,’ for it was out of this spirit alone that the creative force grew, which 
in a unique way, combined robust muscular power with a first-class intellect, 
and thus created the monuments of human civilisation. 


Were it not for idealism, all the faculties of the intellect, even the most 
brilliant, would be nothing but intellect itself, a mere external phenomenon 
without inner value, and never a creative force. 


Since true idealism, however, is essentially the subordination of the 
interests and life of the individual to the interests and life of the community, 
and since this subordination in turn represents the prerequisite condition for 
every form of organisation, this idealism accords in its innermost essence with 
the final purpose of Nature. 


This idealism alone makes men voluntarily acknowledge, that strength 
and power are entitled to take the lead and makes them a constituent particle of 
that order out of which the whole universe is shaped and formed. 


Without being conscious of it, the purest idealism is always associated 
with the most profound knowledge. How True this is and how little genuine 
idealism has to do with fantastic self-dramatization will become clear the 
moment we ask an unspoilt child, a healthy boy, for example, to give his 
opinion. 


The very same boy who listens to the rantings of an ‘idealistic’ pacifist 
without understanding them, and even rejects them, would readily sacrifice his 


333 


young life for the ideal of his people. 


Unconsciously, his instinct will submit to the knowledge that the 
preservation of the species, even at the cost of the individual life, is a primal 
necessity and he will protest against the fantasies of pacifist ranters, who are 
in reality nothing better than cowardly, though camouflaged, egotists, who 
contradict the laws of human development. 


It is an essential aspect of human evolution that the individual should be 
imbued with the spirit of sacrifice in favour of the common weal that he: 
should not be influenced by the morbid notions of those who pretend to know 
better than Nature and who have the impudence to criticise her decrees. 


It is just at those junctures when the idealistic attitude threatens to 
disappear that we notice a weakening of this force which is a necessary 
constituent in the founding and maintenance of the community and 1s therefore a 
necessary condition of civilisation. 


As soon as the spirit of egotism begins to prevail among a people, then 
the bonds of the social order break, and man, by seeking his own personal 
happiness, tumbles out of heaven and falls into hell. 


Posterity will not remember those who pursued only their own 
individual interests, but it will praise those heroes who renounced their own 
happiness. 


The Jew offers the most striking contrast to the Aryan. There is probably 
no other people in the world which has so developed the instinct of self- 
preservation as the so-called ‘chosen’ race. 


The best proof of this statement is to be found in the simple fact that this 
race still exists. Where is another people to be found that in the course of the 
last two thousand years has undergone so few changes in mental, outlook and 
character as the ‘Jewish people? 


And yet what other people has played such a constant part in the great 
revolutions? Even after having passed through the most gigantic catastrophes 
that have overwhelmed mankind, the Jews remain the same as ever. 


What an infinitely tenacious will to live, to preserve one’s kind, is 
demonstrated by that fact! 


334 


The intellectual faculties of the Jew have been trained throughout 
thousands of years. To-day the Jew is looked upon as especially ‘clever’ and 
in a certain sense, he has been so throughout the ages. 


His intellectual powers, however, are not the result of an inner evolution 
but have rather been shaped by the object lessons which he has received from 
others. 


The human spirit cannot climb upwards without taking successive steps. 
For every step upwards it needs the foundation of what has been constructed 
before, namely, the past, which, in the comprehensive sense here employed, 
can have been laid only by a general civilisation. 


All thinking originates only to a very small degree in personal 
experience. The largest part is based on the accumulated experiences of the 
past. 


The general level of civilisation provides the individual, who, in most 
cases, is not consciously aware of the fact, with such an abundance of 
preliminary knowledge, that with this equipment he can more easily take 
further steps on the road of progress. 


The boy of to-day, for example, grows up among such an overwhelming 
mass of technical achievement, which has accumulated during the last century, 
that he takes for granted many things which, a hundred years ago, were still 
mysteries even to the greatest minds of those times. 


Yet these things that are now so much a matter of course are of enormous 
importance to those who would understand the progress we have made in 
certain spheres and would carry that progress a step farther. 


If a man of genius belonging to the twenties of the last century were to 
rise from his grave to-day, he would find it more difficult to understand our 
present age than the contemporary boy of fifteen years of age who may even 
have only an average intelligence. 


The man of genius, thus come back from the past, would need to provide 
himself with an extraordinary, amount of preliminary information which our 
contemporary youth receives automatically, so to speak, during the time it is 
growing up among the products of our modern civilisation. 


Since the Jew—for reasons that I shall deal with immediately—never 


=) 


had a civilisation of his own, he has always been furnished by others with a 
basis for his intellectual work. 


His intellect has always been developed by the use of those cultural 
achievements which he has found ready to hand around him. The process has 
never been the reverse. 


Although among the Jews the instinct of self-preservation has not been 
weaker, but much stronger than among other peoples, and although the 
impression may easily be created that the intellectual powers of the Jew are at 
least equal to those of other races, the Jews completely lack the most essential 
prerequisite of a cultural people, namely, the idealistic spirit. 


With the Jewish people the spirit of self-sacrifice does not extend 
beyond the simple instinct of individual preservation. 


In their case, the feeling of racial solidarity which they apparently 
manifest, is nothing but a very primitive gregarious instinct, similar to that 
which may be found among other organisms in this world. 


It is a remarkable fact that this herd instinct brings individuals together 
for mutual protection, only as long as there is a common danger which makes 
mutual assistance expedient or inevitable. 


The same pack of wolves which, a moment ago, joined together in a 
common attack on their victim will dissolve into individual wolves as soon as 
their hunger has been satisfied. 


This is also true of horses, which unite to defend themselves against any 
aggressor, but separate the moment the danger is over. 


It is much the same with the Jew. His spirit of sacrifice is only apparent. 
It manifests itself only as long as the existence of the individual makes this a 
matter of absolute necessity, but as soon as the common foe is conquered, the 
danger which threatened the individual Jew overcome and the prey secured, 
then the apparent harmony disappears and the original conditions obtain again. 


Jews act in concord only when a common danger threatens them or a 
common prey attracts them. Where these two motives no longer exist, then the 
most brutal egotism appears and these people, who had previously lived 
together in unity, will turn into a swarm of rats that fight bitterly against each 
other. 


336 


If the Jews were the only people in the world, they would be wallowing 
in filth and mire and would exploit one another and try to exterminate one 
another in a bitter struggle, except in so far as their utter lack of the ideal of 
sacrifice, which shows itself in their cowardly spirit, would prevent this 
struggle from developing. 


It would, therefore, be a complete mistake to interpret the mutual help, 
which the Jews render one another when they have to fight or, to put it more 
accurately, to exploit their fellow-beings, as the expression of a certain 
idealistic spirit of sacrifice. 


Here again, the Jew merely follows the call of his individual egotism. 
That is why the Jewish State, which ought to be a vital organisation to serve 
the purpose of preserving or increasing the race, has absolutely no territorial 
boundaries, for the territorial delimitation of a State always demands a certain 
idealism of spirit on the part of the race which forms that State, and especially 
a proper acceptance of the idea of work. 


A State which 1s territorially delimited cannot be established or 
maintained, unless the general attitude towards work is a positive one. If this 
attitude 1s lacking, then the necessary basis of a civilisation is also lacking. 
That is why the Jewish people, despite the intellectual powers with which they 
are apparently endowed, have not a culture, certainly not a culture of their 
own. 


The culture which the Jew enjoys to-day is the product of the work of 
others and this product is debased in the hands of the Jew. 


In order to form a correct judgment of the place which the Jew holds in 
relation to the whole problem of human civilisation, we must bear in mind the 
essential fact that there never has been any Jewish art, and consequently that 
nothing of this kind exists to-day. 


We must realise that, especially in the two royal domains of art, namely, 
architecture and music, the Jew has done no original creative work. 


When the Jew comes to producing something in the field of art he merely 
‘borrows’ from something already in existence, or simply steals the intellectual 
work of others. 


The Jew essentially lacks the qualities which are characteristic of those 
creative races that are the founders of civilisation. 


337 


To what extent the Jew appropriates the civilisation built up by others— 
or to speak more accurately, corrupts it,—is indicated by the fact that he 
cultivates chiefly the art which calls for the smallest amount of original 
invention, namely the dramatic arts, and even here, he 1s nothing better than a 
kind of juggler or, perhaps more correctly, a kind of monkey imitator, for in this 
domain also he lacks the creative élan which is necessary for the production of 
all really great work. 


Even here, therefore, he is not a creative genius, but rather a superficial 
imitator who, in spite of all his retouching and tricks, cannot disguise the fact 
that there is no inner vitality in the shape he gives his products. 


At this juncture, the Jewish press comes in and renders friendly 
assistance by shouting hosannas over the head of even the most ordinary 
bungler of a Jew, until the rest of the world is persuaded into thinking that the 
object of so much praise must really be an artist, whereas in reality, he may be 
nothing more than a low-class mimic. 


The Jews have not the creative ability which is necessary for the 
founding of a civilisation, for in them there 1s not, and never hits been, that 
spirit of idealism which is an absolutely necessary element in the higher 
development of mankind. 


Therefore, the Jewish intellect will never be constructive, but always 
destructive. At best, it may serve as a stimulus in rare cases, but only 1n the 
limited meaning of the poet’s lines, “The Power which always wills the bad, 
and always works the good” (Die stets Bose will und stets das Gute schafft.). 


It is not through him, but in spite of him, that mankind makes progress. 


Since the Jew has never had a State which was based on territorial 
delimitations, and therefore never a civilisation of his own, the idea arose that 
here we were dealing with a people who had to be considered as nomads. 


That is a great and mischievous mistake. The true nomad does actually 
possess a definite delimited territory where he lives. It is merely that he does 
not cultivate it, as the settled farmer does, but that he lives on the products of 
his herds with which he wanders over his domain. 


The natural reason for this mode of existence is to be found in the fact 
that the soil is not fertile and that it does not give the steady produce which 
makes a fixed abode possible. 


338 


Outside of this natural cause, however, there is a more profound cause, 
namely, that no mechanical civilisation is at hand to make up for the natural 
poverty of the region in question. 


There are territories where the Aryan can establish fixed settlements by 
means of the technical skill which he has developed in the course of more than 
a thousand years, even though these territories would otherwise have to be 
abandoned, unless the Aryan were willing to wander about them in nomadic 
fashion, but age-long tradition of settled residence have made the nomadic life 
unbearable for him. 


We ought to remember that during the first period of American 
colonisation, numerous Aryans earned their daily livelihood as trappers, 
hunters, etc., frequently wandering about in large groups with their women and 
children, their mode of existence very much resembling that of ordinary 
nomads. 


The moment, however, that they grew more numerous and were able to 
accumulate larger resources, they cleared the land and drove out the 
aborigines, at the same time establishing settlements which rapidly increased 
all over the country. 


The Aryan himself was probably at first, a nomad and became a settler 
in the course of the ages, but yet he was never of the Jewish kind. 


The Jew is not a nomad, for the nomad has already a definite attitude 
towards the concept of ‘work,’ and this attitude served as the basis of a later 
cultural development when the necessary intellectual conditions existed. 


There is a certain amount of idealism in the general attitude of the 
nomad, even though it is rather primitive. His whole character may, therefore, 
be foreign to Aryan feeling, but it will never be repulsive. 


Not even the slightest trace of idealism exists, however, in the Jewish 
character. The Jew has never been a nomad, but always a parasite, battening on 
the substance of others. 


If he occasionally abandoned regions where he had hitherto lived, he did 
not do it voluntarily. He did it because, from time to time, he was driven out by 
people who were tired of having their hospitality, abused by such guests. 


Jewish self-expansion is a parasitic phenomenon, since the Jew is 


339 


always looking for ‘pastures new’ for his race. But this has nothing to do with 
nomadic life as such, because the Jew does not ever think of leaving a territory 
which he has once occupied. He sticks where he is with such tenacity that he 
can hardly be driven out even by superior physical force. 


He expands into new territories only when certain conditions for his 
existence are provided therein; but even then—unlike the nomad—he will not 
change his former abode. He is, and remains, a parasite, a sponger who, like a 
pernicious bacillus, spreads over wider and wider areas according as some 
favourable area attracts him. 


The effect produced by his presence is also like that of the vampire, for 
wherever he establishes himself the people who grant him hospitality are 
bound to be bled to death sooner or later. 


Thus the Jew has at all times lived in States that have belonged to other 
rags, and within the organisation of those States, he has formed a State of his 
own, which is, however, hidden behind the mask of a ‘religious community,’ as 
long as external circumstances do not make it advisable for this community to 
declare its true nature. 


As soon as the Jew feels himself sufficiently established in his position 
to be able to hold it without a disguise, he lifts the mask and suddenly appears 
in the character which so many did not formerly believe or wish to see, 
namely, that of the Jew. 


The life which the Jew lives as a parasite thriving on the substance of 
other nations and States has resulted in developing that specific character 
which Schopenhauer once described when he spoke of the Jew as ‘the great 
master of lies.’ 


The kind of existence which he leads, forces the Jew to the systematic 
use of falsehood, just as naturally as the inhabitants of northern climates are 
forced to wear warm clothes. 


He can live among other nations and States only as long as he succeeds 
in persuading them that the Jews are not a distinct people, but the 
representatives of a religious faith who thus constitute a ‘religious community,’ 
though this is of a peculiar character. 


As a matter of fact, however, this is the first of his great falsehoods. He 
is obliged to conceal his own particular character and mode of life, in order 


340 


that he may be allowed to continue his existence as a parasite among the 
nations. 


The greater the intelligence of the individual Jew, the better will he 
succeed in deceiving others. His success in this line may even go so far that the 
people who grant him hospitality are led to believe that the Jew among them is 
a genuine Frenchman, for instance, or Englishman or German or Italian, who 
just happens to belong to a religious denomination which is different from that 
prevailing in these countries. 


Especially in circles concerned with the executive administration of the 
State, where the officials generally have only a minimum of historical sense, 
the Jew is able to impose his infamous deception with comparative ease. In 
these circles, independent thinking is considered a sin against the sacred rules 
according to which official promotion takes place. 


It is, therefore, not surprising that even to-day in the Bavarian 
government offices, for example, there is not the slightest suspicion that the 
Jews form a distinct nation in themselves and are not merely the adherents of a 
‘confession,’ though one glance at the press which belongs to the Jews ought to 
furnish sufficient evidence to the contrary even for those who possess only the 
smallest degree of intelligence. 


The Jewish Echo, however, is not an official gazette and therefore not 
authoritative in the eyes of these government potentates. 


The Jews have always been a people of a definite racial character and 
never merely the adherents of a religion. 


At a very early date, urged on by the desire to make their way in the 
world, they began to cast about for a means whereby they might distract such 
attention as might prove inconvenient for them. 


What could be more effective, and at the same time above suspicion, 
than to borrow and utilise the idea of the religious community? 


Here also everything is copied, or rather stolen, for the Jew could not 
possess any religious institution which had developed out of his own 
consciousness, seeing that he lacks every kind of idealism, which means that 
belief ina life beyond this terrestrial existence is foreign to him. 


In the Aryan mind no religion can ever be imagined unless 1t embodies 


341 


the conviction that life in some form of other will continue after death. 


As a matter of fact, the Talmud is not a book that lays down principles 
according to which the individual should prepare for the life to come. It only 
furnishes rules for a practical and convenient life in this world. 


The religious teaching of the Jews is principally a collection of 
instructions for maintaining the Jewish blood pure and for regulating 
intercourse between Jew and Jew and between Jews and the rest of the world, 
that is to say non-Jews. 


The Jewish religious teaching is not concerned with moral problems. It 
is concerned rather with economic problems, and very petty ones at that. 


In regard to the moral value of the religious teaching of the Jews there 
exist, and always have existed, exhaustive studies (not from the Jewish side, 
for whatever the Jews have written on this question has naturally always been 
of a tendentious character), which show up the kind of religion that the Jews 
have ina light which makes it look very uncanny to the Aryan mind. 


The Jew himself is the best example of the kind of product which this 
religious training evolves. His life is of this world only and his mentality is as 
foreign to the true spirit of Christianity, as his character was foreign to the 
great Founder of the new creed two thousand years ago. 


The Founder of Christianity made no secret of His estimation of the 
Jewish people; when He found it necessary, He drove those enemies of the 
human race out of the Temple of God, because then, as always, they used 
religion as a means of advancing their commercial interests. 


At that time Christ was nailed to the Cross for his attitude towards the 
Jews, whereas our modern Christians enter into party politics, and when 
elections are being held they debase themselves to beg for Jewish votes. 


They even enter into political intrigues with the atheistic Jewish parties 
against the interests of their own Christian nation. 


On this first and fundamental lie, the purpose of which is to make people 
believe that Jewry is not a people, but a religion, other lies are subsequently 
based. 


One of these further lies concerns, for example, the language spoken by 


342 


the Jew. For him language is not an instrument for the expression of his inner 
thoughts, but rather a means of cloaking them. 


When talking French his thoughts are Jewish, and when writing German 
rhymes he only gives expression to the character of his own race. 


As long as the Jew has not succeeded in mastering other peoples, he is 
forced to speak their language whether he likes it or not, but the moment that 
the world became the slave of the Jew, it would have to learn some universal 
language (Esperanto, for example), so that by this means the Jew could 
dominate it the more easily. 


How much the whole existence of this people is based on a permanent 
falsehood is proved in a unique way by ‘The Protocols of the Elders of Zion,’ 
which are so violently repudiated by the Jews. 


With groans and moans, the Frankfurter Zeitung repeats again and again 
that these are forgeries. This alone is evidence in favour of their authenticity. 


What many Jews unconsciously wish to do is here clearly set forth. It is 
not necessary to ask out of what Jewish brain these revelations sprang, but 
what is of vital interest is that they disclose, with an almost terrifying 
precision, the mentality and methods of action characteristic of the Jewish 
people and these writings expound, in all their various aspects, the final aims 
towards which the Jews are striving. 


The study of real happenings, however, 1s the best way of judging the 
authenticity of these documents. If the historical developments, which have 
taken place within the last century, be studied in the light of this book, we shall 
understand why the Jewish press incessantly repudiates and denounces it, for 
the Jewish peril will be stamped out the moment the general public comes into 
possession of that book and understands it. 


In order to get to know the Jew properly, it is necessary to study the road 
which he has been following among the other peoples during the last few 
centuries. 


One example will suffice to make this clear. Since his career has been 
the same throughout the ages—yust as the people at whose expense he has 
lives, have remained the same—1it will be best for the purpose of making the 
requisite analysis, to mark his progress by stages. For the sake of simplicity, 
we Shall indicate these stages by letters of the alphabet. 


343 


The first Jews came into what was then called Germanic during the 
period of the Roman invasion, and, as usual, they came as merchants. 


During the turmoil caused by the great migrations of the German tribes 
the Jews seem to have disappeared. We may, therefore, consider the period 
when the Germans formed the first political communities as the beginning of 
that process whereby Central and Northern Europe were again, and this time 
permanently, Judaised. 


A development then began which has always been the same or similar, 
wherever and whenever Jews came into contact with Aryan peoples. 


(a) As soon as the first permanent settlements had been established, the 
Jew was suddenly ‘there.’ He arrived as a merchant and, in the beginning, did 
not trouble to disguise his nationality. 


He still remained openly a Jew, partly it may be, because his appearance 
betrayed the racial difference between him and the people of the country in 
which he dwelt, or because he knew too little of the language. 


It may also be that people of other races refused to mix with him, so that 
he could not very well adopt any other pose than that of a foreign merchant. 
Because of his subtlety and cunning and the lack of experience on the part of 
the people whose guest he became, it was not to his disadvantage openly to 
retain his Jewish character. 


This may even have been advantageous to him, for the foreigner was 
received kindly. 


(b) Slowly but steadily, he began to take part in the economic life around 
him, not as a producer, however, but only as a middleman. 


His commercial cunning, acquired through thousands of years of 
negotiation as an intermediary, made him superior in this field to the Aryans, 
who were still quite ingenuous and indeed clumsy, and whose honesty was 
unlimited, so that after a short time commerce seemed destined to become, a 
Jewish monopoly. 


The Jew began by lending out money and, as usual, at a usurious rate of 
interest. It was he who first introduced the payment of interest on borrowed 
money. 


344 


The danger which this innovation involved was not at first recognised; 
indeed, the innovation was welcomed, because it offered momentary 
advantages. 


(c) At this stage the Jew had become firmly settled; that is to say, he 
inhabited special sections of the cities and towns and had his own quarter in 
the market-towns. Thus he gradually came to forma State within the State. 


He came to look upon the commercial domain and all monetary 
transactions, as a privilege belonging exclusively to himself, and exploited it 
ruthlessly. 


(d) At this stage finance and trade had become his complete monopoly. 
Finally, his usurious rate of interest aroused opposition, and the increasing 
impudence which the Jew began to manifest all round stirred up popular 
indignation, while his display of wealth gave rise to popular envy. 


The cup of his iniquity became full to the brim, when he included landed 
property among his commercial wares and degraded the land to the level ofa 
market commodity. 


Since he himself never cultivated the soil, but considered it as an object 
to be exploited, allowing the peasant to remain on the land, but only on 
condition that he submitted to the most heartless exactions of his new master, 
public antipathy against the Jew steadily increased and finally turned into open 
animosity. 


His extortionate tyranny became so unbearable that people rebelled 
against his control and used physical violence against him. They began to 
scrutinise this foreigner somewhat more closely and then began to discover the 
repulsive traits aid characteristics inherent in him, until finally the gulf 
between the Jews and their hosts could no longer be bridged. 


In times of distress a wave of public anger has usually arisen against the 
Jew; the masses have taken the law into their own hands; they have seized 
Jewish property and ruined the Jew in their urge to protect themselves against 
what they consider to be a scourge of God. 


Having come to know the Jew intimately in the course of centuries, they 
looked upon his presence among them as a public danger comparable only to 
the plague. 


345 


(ce) Then the Jew began to reveal his true character. He paid court to 
governments, with servile flattery, used his money to ingratiate himself further 
and thus regularly secured for himself once again the privilege of exploiting his 
victims. 

Although public wrath flared up against this eternal profiteer and drove 
him out, after a few years he reappeared in those same place, and carried on as 
before. 


No persecution could force him to give up his trade of exploiting other 
people and no amount of harrying succeeded in driving him out permanently. 
He always returned after a short time and it was always the old story with him. 
In an effort to prevent at least the worst from happening, laws were passed 
which debarred the Jew from obtaining possession of land. 


(f) In proportion as the powers of kings and princes increased, the Jew 
sidled up to them. He begged for ‘charters’ and ‘privileges’ which those 
gentlemen, who were generally in financial straits, gladly granted if they 
received adequate payment in return. 


However high the price he has to pay, the Jew will succeed in getting it 
back within a few years with interest and even with compound interest thanks 
to the privilege he has acquired. He is a real leech who clings to the body of 
his unfortunate victims and cannot be removed, so that when the princes found 
themselves in need once again they took the blood from his swollen veins with 
their own hands. 


This game was repeated unendingly. In the case of those who were 
called the ‘German princes,’ the part they played was quite as contemptible as 
that played by the Jew. They were a real scourge to their people. 


Their compeers may be found in some of the government ministers of our 
time. It was due to the German princes that the German nation could not 
succeed in definitely freeing itself from the Jewish peril. 


Unfortunately, the situation did not change at a later period. The princes 
finally received the reward which they had a thousand-fold deserved for all the 
crimes committed by them against their own people. They had allied 
themselves with Satan and later on they discovered that they were in Satan’s 
power. 


(g) By permitting themselves to be entangled in the toils of the Jew, the 


346 


princes prepared their own downfall. The position which they held among 
their people was slowly but steadily undermined, not only by their continued 
failure to guard the interests of their subjects, but by their positive exploitation 
of them. 


The Jew calculated exactly the time when the downfall of the princes 
was approaching and did his best to hasten it. He intensified their financial 
difficulties by hindering them in the exercise of their duty towards their people, 
by encouraging them, through the most servile flattery, to indulge in vicious 
habits, whereby he made himself more and more indispensable to them. 


His astuteness, or rather, his utter unscrupulousness in money affairs 
enabled him to exact fresh payments from the princes subjects, to squeeze the 
money out of them and then have it spent as quickly as possible. 


Every Court had its ‘Court Jew,’ as this plague was called, who tortured 
the innocent victims until they were driven to despair, while at the same time 
he provided the means which the princes squandered on their own pleasures. 


It is not to be wondered at that these ornaments of the human race 
became the recipients of official honours and were even admitted to the ranks 
of the hereditary nobility, thus contributing not only to expose that social 
institution to ridicule, but also to contaminate it from the inside. 


Naturally, the Jew could now exploit the position which he had attained 
and advance even more rapidly than before. 


Finally, he only needed to be baptised in order to become entitled to all 
the rights and privileges which belonged to the children of the nation on which 
he preyed. 


This was an excellent stroke of business for him, and he often availed 
himself of it, to the great joy of the Church, which was proud of having gained 
a new child in the Faith, and also to the joy of Israel, which was happy at 
seeing the trick pulled off successfully. 


(h) At this stage a transformation began to take place in the world of 
Jewry. Up to now they had been Jews, that is to say, they had not hitherto set 
any great value on pretending to be something else, and anyhow, the distinctive 
characteristics which separated them from other races could not be easily 
overcome. 


347 


Even as late as the time of Frederick the Great nobody looked upon the 
Jews as other than a ‘foreign’ people, and Goethe rose up in revolt against the 
failure legally to prohibit marriage between Christians and Jews. 


Goethe was certainly no reactionary and no timeserver; through him 
there spoke the voice of the blood and the voice of reason. 


Notwithstanding the disgraceful happenings taking place in Court circles, 
the people recognised instinctively that the Jew was the foreign body in their 
own flesh and their attitude towards him was dictated by recognition of that 
fact. 


But a change was now destined to take place. In the course of more than 
a thousand years the Jew had learned to master the language of his hosts so 
thoroughly that he considered he might now lay less stress on his Jewish 
character and emphasise his ‘Germanism’ more. 


Though it must have appeared ridiculous and absurd at first sight, he was 
impudent enough to call himself a ‘Teuton,’ which in this case, meant a 
German. 


In that way began one of the most infamous impositions that can be 
imagined. The Jew did not possess the slightest traces of the German character. 


He had only acquired the art of twisting the German language to his own 
uses, and that in a disgusting way, without having assimilated any other feature 
of the German character. Therefore, his command of the language was the sole 
ground on which he could pretend to be a German. 


It is not, however, by the tie of language, but exclusively by the tie of 
blood that the members of a race are bound together, and the Jew himself 
knows this better than any other, seeing that he attaches so little importance to 
the preservation of his own language while at the same time he strives his 
utmost to keep his blood free from intermixture with that of other races. 


A man may acquire and use a new language without much trouble, but it 
is only his old ideas that he expresses through the new language; his inner 
nature is not modified thereby. The best proof of this is furnished by the Jew 
himself. He may speak a thousand tongues and yet his Jewish nature will 
always remain one and the same. 


His distinguishing characteristics were the same when, as a grain- 


348 


merchant, he spoke the Latin language at Ostia two thousand years ago, as they 
are to-day when he tries to sell adulterated flour with the aid of his German 
gibberish. He is always the same Jew. 


That so simple a fact is not recognised by the average head-clerk ina 
German government department, or by an officer in the police force, is also 
self-evident and obvious, since it would be difficult to find another class of 
people who are so lacking in instinct and intelligence as the civil servants 
employed by our modern German state authorities. 


The reason why, at the stage I am dealing with, the Jew so suddenly 
decided to transform himself into a German is not difficult to discover. 


He felt the power of the princes slowly crumbling and therefore looked 
about to find a new social plank on which he might stand. 


Furthermore, his financial domination in all the spheres of economic life 
had become so great that he felt he could no longer sustain that enormous 
structure, or extend his influence, unless he were admitted to the full enjoyment 
of the ‘rights of citizenship.’ 


He aimed at both, preservation and expansion; for the higher he could 
climb, the more alluring became the prospect of reaching the old goal, which 
was promised to him in ancient times, namely world domination to which he 
now looked forward with feverish eyes, as he thought he saw it within his 


grasp. 


Therefore, all his efforts were now directed to becoming a fully-fledged 
citizen, endowed with all civil and political rights. That was the reason for his 
emancipation from the ghetto. 


(1) Thus the Court Jew slowly developed into the democratic Jew, but 
naturally, he still remained associated with persons in higher quarters, and he 
even attempted to push his way further into the inner circles of the ruling set. 


At the same time some other representatives of his race were currying 
favour with the people. 


If we remember the crimes the Jew had committed against the masses of 
the people in the course of so many centuries, how repeatedly and ruthlessly he 
had exploited them and how he had sucked the very marrow of their substance, 
and when we further remember how they gradually came to hate him and 


349 


finally considered him as public scourge then we can well understand how 
difficult the Jew must have found this final transformation; indeed, it must have 
taxed all his powers to be able to present himself as ‘the friend of humanity’ to 
the poor victims whom he had bled white. 


Therefore, the Jew began by making public amends for the crimes which 
he had committed against the people in the past. 


He started his metamorphosis by first appearing as the ‘benefactor’ of 
humanity. 


Since his new philanthropic policy had a very concrete aim in view, he 
could not very well apply to himself the biblical counsel, not to allow his left 
hand to know what his right hand was doing. 


He felt obliged to let as many people as possible know how deeply the 
sufferings of the masses grieved him and to what excesses of personal sacrifice 
he was ready to-go in order to help them. 


With this manifestation of innate modesty, so typical of the Jew, he 
trumpeted his virtues to the world until finally the world actually began to 
believe him. Those who refused to share this belief were considered to be 
doing him an injustice. 


Thus, after a little while he began to twist things round, so as to make it 
appear that it was he who had always been wronged, and not vice versa. There 
were actually some particularly foolish people who could not help pitying this 
poor unfortunate creature of a Jew. 


Attention may be called to the fact that, in spite of his proclaimed 
readiness to make personal sacrifices, the Jew never becomes poor thereby. 
He has a happy knack of always making both ends meet. 


Occasionally, his benevolence might be compared to the manure which 
is not spread over the field merely out of kindness, but rather with a view to 
future produce. 


Anyhow, after a comparatively short period of time, the world was given 
to know that the Jew had become a general benefactor and philanthropist. What 
a unique transformation! 


What is looked upon as more or less natural when done by other people, 


350 


here became an object of astonishment, and even sometimes of admiration, 
because it was considered so unusual in a Jew. 


That is why he has received more credit for his acts of benevolence than 
ordinary mortals. And something more! The Jew became liberal all ofa 
sudden and began to talk enthusiastically of how human progress must be 
encouraged. 


Gradually he assumed the air of being the herald of a new age. Yet, at the 
same time, he continued to undermine the groundwork of that economic system 
which is of most benefit to the people. 


He bought up stock in the various national undertakings and thus pushed 
his influence into the circle of national production, making this latter an object 
of buying and selling on the Stock Exchange, or rather what might be called a 
pawn in a financial game of chess, thus ruining the only basis on which 
personal proprietorship is possible. 


Only with the entrance of the Jew did that feeling of estrangement 
between employers and employees begin which led at a later date to the 
political class-struggle. 


Finally, the Jew gained an increasing influence in all economic 
undertakings by means of his predominance on the Stock Exchange. He 
secured, if not the ownership, at least the control of the working capacity of the 
nation. 


In order to strengthen his political position, he directed his efforts 
towards removing the barrier of racial and civic discrimination which had 
hitherto hindered his advance at every turn. 


With characteristic tenacity he championed the cause of religious 
tolerance for this purpose, and in the Freemason organisation, which had fallen 
completely into his hands, he found a magnificent weapon which helped him to 
achieve his ends. 


Government circles, as well as the higher sections of the political and 
commercial bourgeoisie, fell prey to his plans through his manipulation of the 
masonic net, though they themselves did not even suspect what was happening. 


Only the people as such, or rather the masses which were just becoming 
conscious of their own power and were beginning to use it in the fight for their 


351 


rights and liberties, had hitherto escaped the grip of the Jew. 


At least, his influence had not yet penetrated to the deeper and wider 
sections of the people, This was unsatisfactory to him. 


The most important phase of his policy was therefore to secure control 
over the people. 


The Jew realised that in his efforts to reach the position of public despot 
he would need a ‘pacemaker,’ and he thought he could find a pace-maker if he 
could whip-in sufficiently large sections of the bourgeoisie, but the 
Freemasons failed to catch the glove-manufacturers and the linen-weavers in 
the frail meshes of their net, and so it became necessary to find a grosser and 
withal a more effective means. 


Thus another weapon beside that of freemasonry had to be secured. This 
was the press. The Jew exercised all his skill and tenacity in getting hold of it. 


By means of the press he began gradually to control public life in its 
entirety. He began to drive it along the road which he had chosen for the 
purpose of reaching his own ends, for he was now ina position to create and 
direct that force which, under the name of “public opinion’ is better known to- 
day than it was some decades ago. 


Simultaneously, the Jew gave himself the air of thirsting after knowledge. 
He lauded every phase of progress, particularly those phases which led to the 
ruin of others, for he judges all progress and development from the standpoint 
of the advantages which these bring to his own people. When it brings him no 
such advantages, he is the deadly enemy of enlightenment and hates all culture 
which is real culture as such. All the knowledge which he acquires in the 
schools of others is exploited by him exclusively in the service of his own 
race. 


He now guarded his Jewish ‘nationality’ more jealously than ever 
before. Though bubbling over with talk of ‘enlightenment,’ ‘progress,’ ‘liberty,’ 
‘humanity,’ etc., his first care was to preserve the racial integrity of his own 
people. 


He occasionally bestowed one of his female offspring on an influential 
Christian, but the racial stock of his male descendants was always preserved 
unmixed on principle. He poisoned the blood of others, but preserved his own 
blood unadulterated. 


352 


The Jew scarcely ever married a Christian girl, but the Christian took a 
Jewess to wife. The mongrels that were the issue of this latter union always 
took after the Jewish side. Thus a part of the higher nobility in particular 
became completely degenerate. 


The Jew was well aware of this fact and systematically used this means 
of disarming the intellectual leaders of the opposite race. 


To mask his tactics and fool his victims, he talked of the equality of all 
men, no matter what their race or colour, and the simpletons began to believe 
him. 


Since his whole nature still retained too much that was alien for the 
broad masses of the people to allow themselves to be caught in his snare, he 
used the press to put before the public a picture of himself which was entirely 
untrue to life, but well designed to serve his purpose. 


In the comic papers special efforts were made to represent the Jews as 
an inoffensive little race which, like all others, had its peculiarities. 


The comic papers presented the Jews as fundamentally goodhearted and 
honourable in spite of their manners, which might seem a bit strange. An 
attempt was generally made to make them appear insignificant, rather than 
dangerous. 


During this phase of his progress the chief goal of the Jew was the 
victory of democracy, or rather the supreme hegemony of the parliamentary 
system, which embodied his concept of democracy. 


This institution harmonised best with his purpose, for thus the personal 
element was eliminated and in its place we had the dunder-headed majority, 
inefficiency and, last but by no means least, cowardice. 


The final result must necessarily have been the overthrow of the 
monarchy, which had to come sooner or later. 


(j) A tremendous economic development transformed the social structure 
of the nation. As the small handicrafts gradually disappeared, the manual 
worker was robbed of the chance of earning his bread independently, and sank 
to the level of the proletariat. 


In his stead came the factory worker, whose essential characteristic is 


353 


that he is seldom in a position to support himself independently in later life. In 
the true sense of the word, he is ‘disinherited.’ His old age is a misery to hint 
and can hardly be called a life at all. 


In earlier times ,a similar situation had been created, which had 
imperatively demanded a solution and for which a solution was found. 


Side by side with the peasant and the artisan, a new class had gradually 
developed, namely, that of officials and employees, especially those employed 
in the various’ services of the State. 


They also were a ‘disinherited’ class, in the true sense of the word, but 
the State found a remedy for this unhealthy situation by taking upon itself the 
duty of providing for the State official who was not in a position to make 
provision for his old age. 


Thus the system of pensions and retiring allowances was introduced. 
Private enterprises slowly followed this example in increasing numbers, so 
that to-day every permanent non-manual worker receives a pension in his later 
years, if the firm which he has ,served is one that has reached or exceeded a 
certain limit of size. 


It was only by virtue of the assurance given to State officials, that they 
would be cared for in their old age, that such a high degree of unselfish 
devotion to duty was developed, which in pre-war times was one of the 
distinguishing characteristics of German officials. 


Thus a whole class which had no personal property was saved from 
destitution by an intelligent system of provision, and found a place in the social 
structure of the national community. 


The problem has once again arisen for the State and the nation, but this 
time it is more comprehensive. When the new industries sprang up and 
developed, millions of people left the countryside and the villages to take up 
employment in the big factories. 


The conditions under which this new class found itself forced to live 
were worse than miserable. The more or less mechanical transformation of the 
methods of work hitherto in vogue among the artisans and peasants did not fit 
in well with the habits or mentality of this new working-class. 


The way in which the peasants and artisans had formerly worked had 


354 


nothing comparable to the intensive labour of the new factory-worker. 


In the old trades, time did not play a highly important role, but it became 
an essential element in the new industrial system. 


The formal taking over of the old working hours by the mammoth 
industrial enterprises had fatal results. The actual amount of work hitherto 
accomplished within a certain time was comparatively small, because the 
modern methods of intensive production were then unknown. Therefore, 
although under the older system a working day of fourteen or even fifteen hours 
was not unendurable, now it was beyond the limits of human endurance, 
because under the new system every minute was utilised to the extreme. 


This absurd transference of the old working hours to the new industrial 
system proved fatal in two directions. 


Firstly, 1t ruined the health of the workers; secondly, it destroyed their 
faith in a superior law of justice. 


Finally, on the one hand, a miserable wage was received and, on the 
other, the employer held a much more lucrative position than before. 


In the open country there could be no social problem, because the master 
and the farm-hand were doing the same kind of work and doing it together. 
They ate their food in common, and sometimes even out of the same dish. 


But this, too, was altered. The division created between employer and 
employee seems now to have extended to all branches of life. 


How far this Judaising process has been allowed to take effect among 
our people is illustrated by the fact that manual labour not only receives 
practically no recognition, but is even considered degrading. 


That is not a natural German attitude. It is due to the introduction of a 
foreign element into our lives, and that foreign element is the Jewish spirit, one 
of the effects of which has been to transform the high esteem in which our 
handicrafts were once held into a certain contempt for all manual labour. 


Thus a new social class has grown up which stands in low esteem, and 
the day must come when we shall have to face the question of whether the 
nation will be able to make this class an integral part of the social community, 
or whether the difference of status now existing will become a permanent gulf 


355 


separating this class from the others. 


One thing, however, is certain, namely, that this class does not include 
the worst elements of the community in its ranks, on the contrary, it includes the 
most energetic elements of the nation. 


The sophistication which is the result of a so-called civilisation has not 
yet exercised its disintegrating and degenerating influence on this class. The 
broad masses of this new lower class, consisting of the manual labourers, have 
not yet fallen prey to the morbid weakness of pacifism. They are still robust 
and, if necessary, they can be brutal. 


While our bourgeois middle class paid no attention at all to this 
momentous problem and indifferently allowed events to take their course, the 
Jew realised the manifold possibilities which the situation offered him for the 
future. 


While, on the one hand, he organised capitalistic methods of exploitation 
to the highest possible degree, he curried favour with the victims of his policy 
and his power and ina short while became the leader of their struggle against 
himself. 


‘Against himself? is here only a figurative way of speaking; for this 
‘great master of lies’ knows how to appear in the guise of the innocent and 
throw the guilt on others. 


Since he had the impudence to take a personal lead among the masses, 
they never for a moment suspected that they were falling a prey to one of the 
most infamous deceptions ever practised. 


Yet that is what it actually was. The moment this new class had arisen 
out of the general economic situation and taken shape as, a definite body in the 
social order, the Jew clearly saw where he would find the necessary pace- 
maker for his own progressive march. 


At first he had used the bourgeois class as a battering-ram against the 
feudal order, and now he used the worker against the bourgeois world. 


Just as he succeeded in obtaining civic rights by intrigues carried on 
under the protection of the bourgeois class, he now hoped that by joining in the 
struggle which the workers were waging for their own existence, he would be 
able to obtain the mastery he desired. 


356 


When that moment arrives, the only objective the workers will have to 
fight for will be the future of the Jewish people. 


Without knowing it, the worker is placing himself at the service of the 
very power against which he believes he is fighting. Apparently he is being 
made to fight against capital and thus he is all the more easily brought to fight 
for capitalistic interests. 


Outcries are systematically raised against international capital, but in 
reality it is against the national economic structure that these slogans are 
directed. The idea is to demolish this structure and on its ruins triumphantly 
erect the structure of the International Stock Exchange. 


The method of procedure of the Jew was as follows: He kowtowed to 
the worker, hypocritically pretended to feel pity for him and his lot, and even 
to be indignant at the misery and poverty which he had to endure. 


That is the way in which the Jew endeavoured to gain the confidence of 
the working class. He showed himself eager to study their various hardships, 
whether real or imaginary, and strove to awaken a yearning on the part of the 
workers to change the conditions under which they lived. 


The Jew artfully enkindled that innate yearning for social justice which 
is a typical Aryan characteristic. Once that yearning became alive, it was 
transformed into hatred against those in more fortunate circumstances of life. 


The next stage was to give a precise ideological aspect to the struggle 
for the elimination of social wrongs, and thus the Marxist doctrine was 
invented. By presenting this doctrine as part and parcel of a just vindication of 
social rights, the Jew propagated it all the more effectively, but at the same 
time he provoked the opposition of decent people who refused to admit these 
demands which, because of the form and pseudo-philosophical trimmings in 
which they were presented, seemed fundamentally unjust and unrealisable, for, 
under the cloak of purely social concepts there were hidden aims which were 
of a Satanic character. 


These aims are even openly expounded wish the clarity of unlimited 
impudence. This Marxist doctrine 1s an indivisible mixture of human reason 
and human absurdity, but the combination is arranged in such a way that only 
the absurd part of it could ever be put into practice, never the reasonable part. 


By categorically repudiating the personal worth of the individual and 


357 


also of the nation and its racial constitution, this doctrine destroys the 
fundamental basis of all civilisation, for civilisation depends essentially on 
these very factors. 


Such is the true essence of the Marxist Weltanschauung, in so far as the 
word Weltanschauung can be applied at all to these phantoms arising froma 
criminal brain. 


The destruction of the concept of personality and of race removes the 
chief obstacle which barred the way to domination of the social body by its 
inferior elements, which are the Jews. 


The very absurdity of the economic and political theories of Marxism 
gives the doctrine its peculiar significance. 


Because of, its pseudo-logic, intelligent people refuse to support it, 
while all those who are less accustomed to use their intellectual faculties, or 
who have only a rudimentary notion of economic principles, join the Marxist 
cause wholeheartedly. 


The intelligence behind the movement—for even this movement needs 
intelligence if it is to subsist—is supplied by the Jews themselves, as a 
‘sacrifice’ on their part. 


Thus arose a movement which was composed exclusively of manual 
workers under the leadership of Jews. To all external appearances, this 
movement strives to ameliorate the conditions under which the workers live, 
but in reality its aimis to enslave and thereby annihilate the non-Jewish 
peoples. 


The propaganda which the Freemasons had carried on among the so- 
called intelligentsia, whereby their pacifist teaching paralysed the instinct for 
national self-preservation, was now extended to the broad masses of the 
workers and the bourgeoisie by means of the press, which was almost 
everywhere in Jewish hands. 


To those two instruments of disintegration, a third and still more ruthless 
one was added, namely, the organisation of brute force. Massed columns of 
Marxist attackers were intended to complete the work of attrition which the 
two weapons formerly employed had brought to the verge of fulfilment. 


The combined activity of all these forces has been marvellously 


358 


managed, and it will not be surprising if it turns out that those institutions 
which have always appeared as the organs of the more or less traditional 
authority of the State should now fall before the Marxist attack. 


With very few exceptions, the Jew has found the most complacent 
promoters of his work of destruction among the higher, and even the highest, 
government officials. 


An attitude of sneaking servility towards ‘superiors’ and supercilious 
arrogance towards ‘inferiors’ are the characteristics of this class of people, as 
well as an appalling stupidity which is exceeded only by its amazing self- 
conceit. 


These qualities are of the greatest utility to the Jew in his dealings with 
our authorities and consequently he appreciates them. 


If I were to sketch roughly the actual struggle which is now beginning I 
should describe it somewhat thus: 


Not satisfied with the economic conquest of the world, but demanding 
that it must also come under his political control, the Jew subdivides the 
organised Marxist power into two parts, which correspond to the ultimate 
objectives that are to be fought for in this struggle which is carried on under 
his direction. 


To outward appearance, these seem to be two independent movements, 
but in reality they constitute an indivisible unity. 


The two divisions are the political movement and the trade-union 
movement. 


The trade-union movement has to gather in the recruits. It offers 
assistance and protection to the workers in the hard struggle which they have to 
wage for the bare means of existence, a struggle which has been occasioned by 
the greediness and narrow-mindedness of many of the industrialists. 


Unless the workers are ready to surrender all claims to an existence 
which the mere dignity of human nature itself demands, and unless they are 
ready to submit their fate to the will of employers who, in many cases, have no, 
sense of human responsibility and are utterly callous to human wants, then the 
worker must necessarily take matters into his own hands, seeing that the 
organised social community—that is to say, the State—pays no attention to his 


359 


needs. 


The so-called national-minded bourgeoisie, blinded by its own material 
interests, opposes this life-and-death struggle of the workers and places the 
most difficult obstacles in their way. 


Not only does this bourgeoisie hinder all efforts to bring in legislation 
which would shorten the inhumanly long hours of work, prohibit child-labour, 
grant security and protection to women and improve the hygienic conditions in 
the workshops and the dwellings of the working class, but while it is engaged 
in so doing, the shrewd Jew takes the cause of the oppressed into his own 
hands. 


He gradually becomes the leader of the trade-union movement, which is 
an easy task for him, because he does not genuinely intend to find remedies for 
the social wrong; he pursues only one objective, namely, to gather and 
consolidate a body of followers who will act under his command as an armed 
weapon in the economic war for the destruction of national economic 
independence. 


For, while a sound social policy has to aim at a double objective, that of 
securing a decent standard of public health and welfare on the one hand, and 
that of safeguarding the independence of the economic life of the nation, on the 
other, the Jew does not take these two aims into account at all. 


The destruction of both is one of his main objects. He would ruin, rather 
than safeguard, the independence of the national economic system. 


Therefore, as the leader of the trade-union movement, he has no scruples 
about putting forward demands which not only go beyond the declared purpose 
of the movement, but could not be carried into effect without ruining the 
national economic structure. 


On the other hand, he has no interest in seeing a healthy and sturdy 
population develop; he would be more content to see the people degenerate 
into an unthinking herd which could be reduced to total subjection. 


Because these are his final objectives, he can afford to put forward the 
most absurd claims. 


He knows very well that these claims can never be realised and that, 
therefore, nothing in the actual state of affairs can be altered by them, but that 


360 


the most they can do is to arouse the spirit of unrest among the masses. 


That is exactly the purpose which he wishes such propaganda to serve 
and not a real and honest improvement of the social status of the worker. 


The Jews will, therefore, remain the unquestioned leaders of the trade- 
union movement as long as no far-reaching campaign 1s undertaken for the 
enlightenment of the masses, in order that they may be better enabled to 
understand the causes of their misery. 


The same end might be achieved if the government authorities were to 
get rid of the Jew and his work, for as long as the masses remain as ill- 
informed as they actually are to-day, and as long as the State remains as 
indifferent to their lot as it now is, the masses will follow whatever leaders 
make them the most extravagant promises in regard to economic matters. 


The Jew is a past-master in this art and his activities are not hampered 
by moral considerations of any kind. Naturally, it takes him only a short time to 
defeat all his competitors in this field and drive them from the scene of action. 
In accordance with the general brutality and rapacity of his nature, he turns the 
trade-union movement into an organisation for the exercise of physical 
violence. The resistance and antipathy of those whose insight has hitherto 
saved them from swallowing the Jewish bait, have been broken down by 
terrorism. 


The success of that kind of activity is enormous. Actually, the Jew is 
using the trade-union, which could be a blessing to the nation, as a weapon 
with which to destroy the foundations of the national economic structure. 


Side by side with this, the political organisation advances. It operates 
hand-in-hand with the trade-union movement, inasmuch as the latter prepares 
the masses for the political organisation and even forces them into it. 


This is also the source that provides the money which the political 
organisation needs to keep its enormous apparatus in action. 


The trade-union organisation is the organ of control for the political 
activity of its members and whips in the masses for all great political 
demonstrations. 


In the end, it ceases to struggle for economic interests, but places its 
chief weapon, refusal to continue work (which takes the form of a general 


361 


strike) at the disposal of the political movement. 


In a press, the reading matter of which is adapted to the level of the most 
ignorant readers, the political and trade-union organisations are provided with 
an instrument which prepares the lowest stratum of the nation for a campaign of 
ruthless destruction. 


It is not considered part of the purpose of this press to inspire its readers 
with ideals which might help them to lift their minds above the sordid 
conditions of their daily lives, but, on the contrary, it panders to their lowest 
instincts. 


Among the lazy-minded and self-seeking sections of the masses this kind 
of speculation turns out lucrative. 


It is this press, above all, which carries on a fanatical campaign of 
calumny, strives to tear down everything that might be considered mainstay of 
national independence, cultural standing and economic self-sufficiency. 


It aims its attacks especially against all men of character who refuse to 
fall into line with the Jewish efforts to obtain control over the State, or who 
appear dangerous to the Jews merely because of their superior intelligence. 


In order to incur the enmity of the Jew it is not necessary to show any 
open hostility towards him; it is sufficient if a man is considered capable of 
opposing the Jew at some time in the future, or of using his abilities and 
character to enhance the power and position of a nation which the Jew 
considers hostile to himself. 


The Jew’s instinct, which never fails where these problems have to be 
dealt with, readily discerns the true mentality of those whom he meets in 
everyday life and those who are not of a kindred spirit may be sure of being 
listed among his enemies. 


Since the Jew is not the object of aggression, but himself the aggressor, 
he considers as his enemies not only those who attack him, but also those who 
may be capable of resisting him. 


The means which he employs to break people of this kind who show 
themselves decent and upright, 1s no honourable conflict, but falsehood and 
calumny. He will stop at nothing. His utterly lowdown conduct is so appalling 
that one really cannot be surprised if, in the imagination of our people, Satan, 


362 


as the incarnation of all evil, assumes the form and features of the Jew. 


The ignorance of the broad masses as regards the inner character of the 
Jew, and the lack of instinct and insight displayed by our upper classes, are 
among the reasons which explain how it is that so many people fall an easy 
prey to the systematic campaign of falsehood which the Jew carries on. 


While the upper classes, with their innate cowardliness, turn away from 
anyone whom the Jew thus attacks with lies and calumny, the common people 
are credulous of everything, whether because of their ignorance or their 
simple-mindedness. 


Government authorities wrap themselves ina cloak of silence, but more 
frequently they persecute the victims of Jewish attacks in order to stop the 
campaign in the Jewish press. 


To the fatuous mind of the government official, such a line of conduct 
appears to be in line with the policy of upholding the authority of the State and 
preserving public order. 


Gradually, the Marxist weapon in the hands of the Jew becomes a 
constant bogey to decent people and weighs upon them like a kind of 
nightmare. People begin to quail before this fearful foe and thereby become his 
victims. 

(k) The domination of the Jew in the State seems now so fully assured 
that not only can he afford to call himself a Jew once again, but he even 
acknowledges freely and openly his ideas on racial and political questions. 


A section of the Jews avows itself quite openly as an alien people, but 
even here there is another falsehood. 


When the Zionists try to make the rest of the world believe that the new 
national consciousness of the Jews will be satisfied by the establishment of a 
Jewish State in Palestine, the Jews thereby adopt another means to dupe the 
simple-minded Aryan. 


They have not the slightest intention of building up a Jewish State in 
Palestine so as to live init. What they are really aiming at is to establisha 
central organisation for their international swindling and cheating. 


AS a sovereign State, this cannot, be controlled by any of the other 


363 


States. Therefore, it can serve as a refuge for swindlers who have been found 
out, and at the same time, a high school for the training of other swindlers. As a 
sign of their growing confidence and sense of security, a certain section of 
them openly and impudently proclaims its Jewish nationality, while another 
section hypocritically pretend to be German, French or English, as the case 
may be. 


Their blatant behaviour in their relations with other people shows how 
clearly they envisage their day of triumph in the near future. 


The black-haired Jewish youth lies in wait for hours on end, Satanically 
glaring at and spying on the unsuspecting girl whom he plans to seduce, 
adulterating her blood and removing her from the bosom of her own people. 


The Jew uses every possible means to undermine the racial foundations 
of a people to be subjugated. 


In his systematic efforts to ruin girls and women, he strives to break 
down the last barriers of racial discrimination. 


The Jews were responsible for bringing Negroes into the Rhineland, 
with the ultimate idea of bastardizing the white race which they hate, and thus 
lowering its cultural and political level so that the Jew might dominate. 


As long as a people remains racially pure and race-conscious, it can 
never be overcome by the Jew. Never in this world can the Jew become master 
of any people except a bastardised people. 


That is why the Jew systematically endeavours to lower the racial 
quality of a people by permanently adulterating the blood of the individuals 
who make up that people. 


In the field of politics he now begins to replace the idea of democracy by 
that of the dictatorship of the proletariat. 


In the masses organised under the Marxist banners he has found a 
weapon which makes it possible for him to discard democracy, so as to 
subjugate and rule the nations in a dictatorial fashion by the aid of brute force. 


He works systematically in order to bring about this revolution by two 
methods, the economic and the political. 


Aided by international influences, he forms a ring of enemies around 


364 


those nations which have proved themselves too sturdy for him, in 
withstanding attacks from within. 


He tries to force them into war and then, if it should be necessary to his 
plans, he will unfurl the banners of revolt even while the troops are actually 
fighting at the front. 


Economically, he brings about the destruction of the State by a systematic 
method of sabotaging social enterprises until these become so costly that they 
are taken out of the hands of the State and submitted to the control of Jewish 
finance. 


Politically, he works to withdraw from the State its means of 
subsistence, inasmuch as he undermines the foundations of national resistance 
and defence, destroys the confidence which the people have in their 
government, reviles the past and its history and drags everything really great 
into the gutter. 


Culturally, his activity consists in poisoning art, literature and the 
theatre, holding the expression of natural sentiment up to scorn, overturning all 
concepts of the sublime and beautiful, the worthy and the good, finally dragging 
the people down to the level of his own low mentality. 


Of religion he makes a mockery. Morality and decency are described as 
antiquated prejudices and thus a systematic attack is made for the purpose of 
undermining those last foundations on which the national being must rest if the 
nation is to struggle for its existence in this world. 


(1) Now begins the great and final revolution. As soon as the Jew is in 
possession of political power he drops all pretence. Out of the democratic 
Jew, the Jew of the people, arises the Jew lusting for blood, the tyrant of the 
peoples. 


In the course of a few years he endeavours to exterminate all those who 
represent the national intelligentsia, and by thus depriving the peoples of their 
natural intellectual leaders, he orepares them for their fate as slaves under a 
lasting despotism. Russia furnishes the most terrible example of such slavery. 


In that country the Jew killed or starved thirty millions of the people ina 
bout of savage fanaticism and resorted to the employment of inhuman torture. 
He did this so that a gang of Jewish would-be literati and financial bandits 
should dominate over a great people. 


365 


The final consequence is not merely that the people lose all their 
freedom under the domination of the Jews, but that in the end, these parasites 
themselves disappear. The death of the victim is followed sooner or later by 
that of the vampire. 


If we review all the causes which contributed to bring about the 
downfall of the German people we shall find that the most profound acid 
decisive cause lies in lack of insight into the racial problem and especially in 
failure to recognise the Jewish menace. It would have been easy enough to 
endure the defeats suffered on the battlefields in August 1918. They were 
nothing as compares with the military victories which our nation had achieved. 


Our downfall was not the result of those defeats; we were overthrown by 
that force which had prepared those defeats by systematically operating for 
several decades to destroy those political instincts and that moral stamina 
which alone enable a people to struggle for its existence and thereby secure the 
right to exist. 


By neglecting the problem of preserving the racial foundations of our 
national life, the old Reich abrogated the sole right which entitles a people to 
live on this planet. 


Nations that make mongrels of their people or allow their people to be 
turned into mongrels, sin against the Will of Eternal Providence, and thus their 
overthrow at the hands of a stronger opponent cannot be looked upon as a 
wrong but, on the contrary, as a restoration of justice. 


If a people refuses to guard and uphold the qualities with which it has 
been endowed by Nature and which have their roots in the racial blood, then 
such a people has no right to complain over the loss of its earthly existence. 


Everything on this earth can be changed for the better. 
Every defeat may be made the foundation of a future victory. 
Every lost war may be the cause of a later resurgence. 


Every form of distress can give, a new impetus to human energy, and 
from oppression those forces can develop which bring about a re-birth of the 
national soul—provided always that the racial blood is kept pure. 


The loss of racial purity will wreck inner happiness for ever. 


366 


It degrades men for all time to come, and the physical and moral 
consequences can never be wiped out. 


If this unique problem be studied and compared with the other problems 
of life we shall easily recognise how small is their importance in comparison 
with this. 


They are all limited in time, but the problem of the maintenance or loss 
of the purity of the racial blood will last as long as man himself exists. 


All the symptoms of decline which manifested themselves in pre-war 
times can be traced back to the racial problem. 


Whether one is dealing with questions of general law, of monstrous 
wrongs in economic life, of phenomena which point to a cultural decline or 
political degeneration whether it be a question of defects in the school-system 
or of the evil influence which the press exerts over the adult population in 
every case there phenomena are caused by a lack of consideration for the 
interests of the race to which one’s own nation belongs, or by failure to 
recognise the danger that comes from allowing a foreign race to exist within 
the national body. 


That is why all attempts at reform, all institutions for social relief, all 
political striving, all economic progress and all apparent increase in the 
general stock of knowledge, were doomed to be unproductive of any 
significant results. 


The nation, as well as the organisation which enables it to exist, namely, 
the State, were not developing in inner strength and stability but were, on the 
contrary, visibly losing their vitality. 


The false brilliance of the Second Reich could not disguise its inner 
weakness, and every attempt to invigorate it anew failed, because the main and 
most important problem was left out of consideration. It would be a mistake to 
think that the followers of the various political parties which tried to doctor the 
condition of the German people, or even all their leaders, were bad in 
themselves or meant wrong. Their activity was doomed to fail, merely 
because, at best, they saw nothing but the symptoms of our general malady and 
they tried to doctor the symptoms while they overlooked the real cause of the 
disease. 


If one makes a methodical study of the lines along which the old Reich 


367 


developed, one cannot help seeing, after a careful political analysis, that a 
process of inner degeneration had already set in, even at the time when the 
united Reich was established and the German nation was enjoying prosperity. 


The general situation was declining, in spite of apparent political 
success and in spite of increasing economic wealth. At the Reichstag elections 
the growing number of Marxist votes indicated that the internal breakdown and 
the political collapse were rapidly approaching. 


All the victories of the so-called bourgeois parties were fruitless, not 
only because they could not prevent the numerical increase is the growing mass 
of Marxist votes, even when the bourgeois parties triumphed at the polls, but 
mainly because they themselves were already infected with the germs of decay. 
Though quite unaware of, it, the bourgeois world was infected from within 
with the deadly virus of Marxist ideas. The fact that they sometimes openly 
resisted was to be attributed to rivalry between ambitious political leaders, 
rather than to any opposition on principle between adversaries who were 
determined to fight one another to the bitter end. 


During all those years only one protagonist was fighting with steadfast 
perseverance. This was the Jew. The Star of David steadily ascended, as the 
will to national self-preservation declined. 


Therefore, it was not a nation filled with the determination to attack, 
which rushed to the battlefields in August 1914, but it was rather the 
manifestation of the last flickering instinct of national self-preservation in the 
face of the progress of the paralysis with which the pacifist and Marxist 
doctrine threatened our people. Even in those days when the fate of the nation 
hung in the balance, the internal enemy was not recognised and therefore all 
efforts to resist the external enemy were bound to be in vain. 


Providence did not grant the reward to the victorious sword, but 
followed the eternal law of retributive justice. A profound recognition of all 
this was the source of those principles and tendencies which inspire our new 
Movement. We were convinced that only by recognising such truths could we 
stop the national decline in Germany and lay a granite foundation on which the 
State could again be built up, a State which would not be a piece of mechanism 
alien to our people, constituted for economic needs and interests, but an 
organism created from the soul of the people themselves. 


A GERMANIC STATE OF THE GERMAN NATION. 


368 


369 


370 
